Maryland, session 2025, HB0834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0834*

HOUSE BILL 834
SUBTITLE 11. CONFINEMENT OF EGG–LAYING HENS IN COMMERCIAL EGG
PRODUCTION.
3–1101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “BUSINESS OWNER OR OPERATOR” MEANS ANY PERSON THAT
OWNS OR CONTROLS THE OPERATIONS OF A BUSINESS.
(2) “BUSINESS OWNER OR OPERATOR” INCLUDES A PERSON THAT
OWNS OR CONTROLS THE OPERATIONS OF:
(I) A RETAIL BUSINESS;
(II) A WHOLESALE BUSINESS;
(III) A DISTRIBUTION BUSINESS; OR
(IV) A FOOD SERVICE BUSINESS.
(C) (1) “CAGE–FREE HOUSING SYSTEM” MEANS AN INDOOR OR OUTDOOR
CONTROLLED ENVIRONMENT FOR EGG–LAYING HENS WITHIN WHICH HENS:
(I) ARE FREE TO ROAM UNRESTRICTED;
(II) ARE PROVIDED ENRICHMENTS THAT ALLOW THE HENS TO
EXHIBIT NATURAL BEHAVIORS, INCLUDING, AT A MINIMUM, SCRATCH AREAS,
PERCHES, NEST BOXES, AND DUST BATHING AREAS; AND
(III) MAY BE PROVIDED CARE BY EMPLOYEES WHILE WITHIN
THE HENS’ USABLE FLOOR SPACE.
(2) “CAGE–FREE HOUSING SYSTEM” INCLUDES:
(I) MULTITIERED AVIARIES IN WHICH EGG–LAYING HENS HAVE
UNFETTERED ACCESS TO MULTIPLE ELEVATED PLATFORMS THAT PROVIDE THE
EGG–LAYING HENS WITH USABLE FLOOR SPACE ON TOP OF AND BELOW THE
PLATFORMS;
(II) PARTIALLY SLATTED SYSTEMS IN WHICH EGG–LAYING
HENS HAVE UNFETTERED ACCESS TO ELEVATED PLATFORMS UNDER WHICH

HOUSE BILL 834 3
MANURE DROPS THROUGH THE FLOORING TO A PIT OR LITTER REMOVAL BELT
BELOW;
(III) SINGLE–LEVEL, ALL–LITTER FLOOR SYSTEMS BEDDED
WITH LITTER IN WHICH EGG–LAYING HENS HAVE LIMITED OR NO ACCESS TO
ELEVATED PLATFORMS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER SYSTEM THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) “CAGE–FREE HOUSING SYSTEM” DOES NOT INCLUDE SYSTEMS
COMMONLY DESCRIBED AS BATTERY CAGES, COLONY CAGES, ENRICHED CAGES,
ENRICHED COLONY CAGES, MODIFIED CAGES, CONVERTIBLE CAGES, FURNISHED
CAGES, OR SIMILAR CAGE SYSTEMS.
(D) “EGG–LAYING HEN” MEANS ANY LIVING FEMALE DOMESTICATED BIRD
KEPT FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMMERCIAL EGG PRODUCTION.
(E) (1) “EGG PRODUCTS” MEANS RAW OR TREATED POULTRY EGGS THAT
HAVE BEEN REMOVED FROM THE SHELL, IN LIQUID, SOLID, DRIED, OR FROZEN
FORM, AND ARE INTENDED FOR HUMAN FOOD.
(2) “EGG PRODUCTS” INCLUDES RAW AND COOKED EGGS, EGGS WITH
THE YOLKS AND WHITES IN THEIR NATURAL PROPORTIONS, AND EGGS WITH THE
YOLKS AND WHITES SEPARATED, MIXED, OR MIXED AND STRAINED.
(3) “EGG PRODUCTS” DOES NOT INCLUDE COMBINATION FOOD
PRODUCTS THAT ARE COMPOSED OF MORE THAN JUST EGG PRODUCTS AND FOOD
ADDITIVES, SUCH AS SUGAR, SALT, WATER, SEASONING, COLORING, FLAVORING,
PRESERVATIVES, STABILIZERS, OR SIMILAR FOOD ADDITIVES.
(F) “FARM” MEANS THE LAND, BUILDINGS, SUPPORT FACILITIES, AND
OTHER EQUIPMENT THAT ARE WHOLLY OR PARTIALLY USED FOR THE COMMERCIAL
PRODUCTION OF ANIMALS OR ANIMAL PRODUCTS USED FOR FOOD, NOT INCLUDING
LIVE ANIMAL MARKETS AND OFFICIAL PLANTS AT WHICH MANDATORY INSPECTION
IS MAINTAINED UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 1031 ET SEQ.
(G) “SALE” MEANS A COMMERCIAL SALE OF SHELL EGGS OR EGG
PRODUCTS.
(H) “SHELL EGGS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–301 OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 834
(I) (1) “USABLE FLOOR SPACE” MEANS THE TOTAL SQUARE FOOTAGE OF
FLOOR SPACE PROVIDED TO EACH EGG–LAYING HEN, AS CALCULATED BY DIVIDING
THE TOTAL SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE FLOOR SPACE PROVIDED TO THE EGG–LAYING
HENS IN THE ENCLOSURE BY THE NUMBER OF EGG–LAYING HENS IN THAT
ENCLOSURE.
(2) “USABLE FLOOR SPACE” INCLUDES GROUND AND ELEVATED
LEVEL OR NEARLY LEVEL FLAT PLATFORMS UPON WHICH HENS CAN ROOST.
(3) “USABLE FLOOR SPACE” DOES NOT INCLUDE PERCHES OR RAMPS.
3–1102.
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE REGULATION OF
EGG PRODUCTION ON FARMS IN THE STATE AND OF THE SALE OF EGGS AND EGG
PRODUCTS IN THE STATE WILL FURTHER THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY’S GOALS TO
PROTECT THE PUBLIC HEALTH AND WELFARE OF CONSUMERS, TO PROMOTE FOOD
SAFETY, AND TO ADVANCE ANIMAL WELFARE.
3–1103.
THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE DO NOT APPLY TO THE PRODUCTION IN
THE STATE OR THE SALE IN THE STATE OF SHELL EGGS BY A FARM OWNER OR
OPERATOR THAT ANNUALLY PRODUCES SHELL EGGS FROM FEWER THAN 5,000
EGG–LAYING HENS, IF ALL SHELL EGGS SOLD IN THE STATE BY THE FARM OWNER
OR OPERATOR ARE DERIVED FROM THE 5,000 OR FEWER EGG–LAYING HENS.
3–1104.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE CONFINEMENT OF EGG–LAYING
HENS FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(1) MEDICAL RESEARCH;
(2) EXAMINATION, TESTING, INDIVIDUAL TREATMENT, OR
OPERATION FOR VETERINARY PURPOSES PERFORMED BY OR UNDER THE DIRECT
SUPERVISION OF A LICENSED VETERINARIAN;
(3) TRANSPORTING EGG–LAYING HENS;
(4) STATE OR COUNTY FAIR EXHIBITIONS, 4–H PROGRAMS, OR
SIMILAR EXHIBITIONS; OR

HOUSE BILL 834 5
(5) ANIMAL HUSBANDRY, PROVIDED THAT THE CONFINEMENT IS FOR
NOT MORE THAN 6 HOURS IN A 24–HOUR PERIOD AND 24 HOURS IN A 30–DAY
PERIOD.
(B) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2030, A FARM OWNER OR OPERATOR MAY
NOT KNOWINGLY CONFINE AN EGG–LAYING HEN IN AN ENCLOSURE THAT:
(1) IS NOT A CAGE–FREE HOUSING SYSTEM;
(2) HAS LESS THAN 1.0 SQUARE FOOT OF USABLE FLOOR SPACE PER
HEN IN A CAGE–FREE HOUSING SYSTEM THAT PROVIDES EGG–LAYING HENS WITH
UNFETTERED ACCESS TO VERTICAL SPACE, SUCH AS A MULTITIERED AVIARY OR A
PARTIALLY SLATTED SYSTEM; OR
(3) HAS LESS THAN 1.5 SQUARE FEET OF USABLE FLOOR SPACE PER
HEN IN A CAGE–FREE HOUSING SYSTEM THAT DOES NOT PROVIDE EGG–LAYING
HENS WITH UNFETTERED ACCESS TO VERTICAL SPACE, SUCH AS A SINGLE–LEVEL
ALL–LITTER FLOOR SYSTEM.
3–1105.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, A SALE IS DEEMED TO OCCUR AT THE LOCATION
WHERE THE BUYER TAKES PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF THE SHELL EGGS OR EGG
PRODUCTS.
(B) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2030, A BUSINESS OWNER OR OPERATOR OR
FARM OWNER OR OPERATOR MAY NOT SELL SHELL EGGS OR EGG PRODUCTS THAT
THE OWNER OR OPERATOR KNOWS OR SHOULD HAVE KNOWN WERE PRODUCED BY
AN EGG–LAYING HEN THAT WAS CONFINED IN A MANNER INCONSISTENT WITH §
3–1104 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) IT IS A DEFENSE TO ANY ACTION TO ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE THAT A
BUSINESS OWNER OR OPERATOR RELIED IN GOOD FAITH ON A WRITTEN
CERTIFICATION OBTAINED THAT THE SHELL EGGS OR EGG PRODUCTS AT ISSUE
WERE NOT DERIVED FROM EGG–LAYING HENS THAT WERE CONFINED IN A MANNER
INCONSISTENT WITH § 3–1104 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
3–1106.
THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE THIS SUBTITLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 834
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY
OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
3–1107.
(A) IF THE SECRETARY FINDS THAT SHELL EGGS OR EGG PRODUCTS ARE
BEING SOLD IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE SECRETARY MAY ISSUE A
WRITTEN OR PRINTED “STOP–SALE” ORDER TO THE PERSON VIOLATING THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) AFTER RECEIPT OF AN ORDER ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
RECIPIENT OF THE ORDER MAY NOT SELL ANY SHELL EGGS OR EGG PRODUCTS
SUBJECT TO THE ORDER.
(C) A PERSON WHO HAS BEEN ISSUED A “STOP–SALE” ORDER UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY APPEAL TO THE SECRETARY.
3–1108.
(A) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ENFORCEMENT ACTION TAKEN BY THE
SECRETARY UNDER § 3–1107 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE SECRETARY SHALL IMPOSE A
CIVIL PENALTY FOR EACH VIOLATION IN AN AMOUNT NOT EXCEEDING:
(1) $500 FOR A FIRST VIOLATION;
(2) $1,000 FOR A SECOND VIOLATION; AND
(3) $2,000 FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION.
(B) THE CRIMINAL PENALTIES UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS
ARTICLE DO NOT APPLY TO THIS SUBTITLE.
4–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Shell eggs” means raw or treated poultry eggs that are still in the shell and
intended for human consumption.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.